Rhode Island, session 2025, SB659.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-16-13 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-16 entitled "Teachers’
Retirement [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-16-13. Amount of service retirement allowance.
(a)(1)(i) For teachers eligible to retire on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement
from service under § 16-16-12 a teacher whose membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and
who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall
receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in accordance with schedule A for service
prior to July 1, 2012.
SCHEDULE A
YEARS OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE ALLOWANCE
1st through 10th inclusive 1.7%
11th through 20th inclusive 1.9%
21st through 34th inclusive 3.0%
35th 2.0%
(ii) For teachers eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire
on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement for service under § 16-16-12, a teacher whose
membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years of
contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall receive a retirement allowance which shall be

determined in accordance with schedule A above for service on before September 30, 2009, and
shall be determined in accordance with schedule B in subsection (a)(2) below for service on or after
October 1, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2012.
(2) Upon retirement from service under § 16-16-12 a teacher whose membership
commenced after July 1, 2005, or who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory
service as of July 1, 2005, shall receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in
accordance with Schedule B for service prior to July 1, 2012.
SCHEDULE B
YEARS OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE ALLOWANCE
1st through 10th inclusive 1.60%
11th through 20th inclusive 1.80%
21st through 25th inclusive 2.0%
26th through 30th inclusive 2.25%
31st through 37th inclusive 2.50%
38th 2.25%
(b) The retirement allowance of any teacher whose membership commenced before July 1,
2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1,
2005, shall be in an amount equal to the percentage allowance specified in subsection (a)(1) of the
member’s average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation multiplied by the number
of years of total service, but in no case to exceed eighty percent (80%) of the compensation, payable
at completion of thirty-five (35) years of service; provided, however, for teachers retiring on or
after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, the calculation
shall be based on the average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation; provided,
however for teachers retiring on or after July 1, 2024, the calculation shall be based on the average
highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation; provided, however for teachers retiring on or
after July 1, 2024, the calculation shall be based on the average highest three (3) consecutive years
of compensation.
The retirement allowance of any teacher whose membership commenced after July 1, 2005,
or who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service as of July 1, 2005, shall be
in an amount equal to the percentage allowance specified in Schedule B of the member’s average
highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation multiplied by the number of years of total
service, but in no case to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the compensation, payable at
completion of thirty-eight (38) years of service; provided, however, for teachers retiring on or after
October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, the calculation shall be
LC002348 - Page 2 of 8

based on the average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation; provided, however, for
teachers retiring on or after July 1, 2024, the calculation shall be based on the average highest three
(3) consecutive years of compensation; provided, however for teachers retiring on or after July 1,
2024, the calculation shall be based on the average highest three (3) consecutive years of
compensation.
Any teacher who has in excess of thirty-five (35) years on or before June 2, 1985, shall not
be entitled to any refund, and any teacher with thirty-five (35) years or more on or after June 2,
1985, shall contribute from July 1, 1985, until their retirement.
(c) For service prior to July 2012, the retirement allowance of a teacher shall be determined
in accordance with subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) above. For service on and after July 1, 2012:
(i) For teachers with fewer than twenty (20) years of total service as of June 30, 2012, a
teacher’s retirement allowance shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the teacher’s average
compensation multiplied by the teacher’s years of total service on and after July 1, 2012; and
(ii) For teachers with twenty (20) or more years of total service as of June 30, 2012, a
teacher’s retirement allowance shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the teacher’s average
compensation multiplied by the teacher’s years of total service between July 1, 2012, and June 30,
2015, and two percent (2%) of the teacher’s average compensation multiplied by the teacher’s years
of total service on and after July 1, 2015. For purposes of computing a teacher’s total service under
the preceding sentence, service purchases shall be included in total service only with respect to
those service purchases approved prior to June 30, 2012, and those applications for service
purchases received by the retirement system on or before June 30, 2012. In no event shall a
teacher’s retirement allowance exceed the maximum limitations set forth in subsection (b) above.
(iii) Effective July 1, 2025, a teacher’s retirement allowance shall be calculated as follows:
1-20 years of service 1% per year
21-30 years of service 1.5% per year
31-35 years of service 2% per year
36-40 years of service 3% per year
SECTION 2. Section 36-10-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-10 entitled "Retirement
System — Contributions and Benefits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-10-10. Amount of service retirement allowance.
(a)(1)(i) For employees eligible to retire on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement
for service under § 36-10-9, a member whose membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and
who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall
receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in accordance with schedule A below for
LC002348 - Page 3 of 8

service prior to July 1, 2012:
Schedule A
Years of Service Percentage Allowance
1st through 10th inclusive 1.7%
11th through 20th inclusive 1.9%
21st through 34th inclusive 3.0%
35th 2.0%
(ii) For employees eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to
retire on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement from service under § 36-10-9, a member
whose membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years
of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall receive a retirement allowance which shall
be determined in accordance with schedule A above for service on before September 30, 2009, and
shall be determined in accordance with schedule B in subsection (a)(2) below for service on or after
October 1, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2012.
(2) Upon retirement for service under § 36-10-9, a member whose membership
commenced after July 1, 2005, or who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory
service as of July 1, 2005, shall, receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in
accordance with Schedule B below for service prior to July 1, 2012:
Schedule B
Years of Service Percentage Allowance
1st through 10th inclusive 1.60%
11th through 20th inclusive 1.80%
21st through 25th inclusive 2.0%
26th through 30th inclusive 2.25%
31st through 37th inclusive 2.50%
38th 2.25%
(b) The retirement allowance of any member whose membership commenced before July
1, 2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1,
2005, shall be in an amount equal to the percentage allowance specified in subsection (a)(1) of the
member’s average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation multiplied by the number
of years of total service, but in no case to exceed eighty percent (80%) of the compensation payable
at completion of thirty-five (35) years of service; provided, however, for employees retiring on or
after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, the calculation
shall be based on the average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation; provided,
LC002348 - Page 4 of 8

however, for employees retiring on or after July 1, 2024, the calculation shall be based on the
average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation. Any member who has in excess of
thirty-five (35) years on or before June 2, 1985, shall not be entitled to any refund, and any member
with thirty-five (35) years or more on or after June 2, 1985, shall contribute from July 1, 1985, until
the member’s retirement.
The retirement allowance of any member whose membership commenced after July 1,
2005, or who had not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service as of July 1, 2005,
shall, be in an amount equal to the percentage allowance specified in Schedule B of the member’s
average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation multiplied by the number of years of
total service, but in no case to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the compensation payable at
the completion of thirty-eight (38) years of service; provided, however, for employees retiring on
or after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, the calculation
shall be based on the average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation; provided,
however, for employees retiring on or after July 1, 2024, the calculation shall be based on the
average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation.
(c) Any member with thirty-eight (38) years or more of service prior to December 31, 1985,
shall not be required to make additional contributions. Contributions made between December 31,
1985, and July 1, 1987, by members with thirty-eight (38) or more years of service prior to
December 31, 1985, shall be refunded by the retirement board to the persons, their heirs,
administrators, or legal representatives.
(d) For service prior to July 1, 2012, the retirement allowance of a member shall be
determined in accordance with subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) above. For service on and after July 1,
2012, a member’s retirement allowance shall be equal to:
(i) For members with fewer than twenty (20) years of total service as of June 30, 2012, one
percent (1%) of the member’s average compensation multiplied by the member’s years of total
service on and after July 1 2012; and
(ii) For members with twenty (20) or more years of total service as of June 30, 2012, a
member’s retirement allowance shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the member’s average
compensation multiplied by the member’s years of total service between July 1, 2012, and June 30,
2015, and two percent (2%) of the member’s average compensation multiplied by the member’s
years of total service on and after July 1, 2015. For purposes of computing a member’s total service
under the preceding sentence, service purchases shall be included in total service only with respect
to those service purchases approved prior to June 30, 2012, and those applications for service
purchases received by the retirement system on or before June 30, 2012.
LC002348 - Page 5 of 8

(iii) Effective July 1, 2025, an employee’s retirement allowance shall be calculated as
follows:
1-20 years of service 1% per year
21-30 years of service 1.5% per year
31-35 years of service 2% per year
36-40 years of service 3% per year
In no event shall a member’s retirement allowance exceed the maximum limitations set
forth in paragraph (b) above.
SECTION 3. Section 45-21-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-21 entitled "Retirement
of Municipal Employees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-21-17. Service retirement allowance.
(a) Upon retirement from service after January 1, 1969, a member shall receive a retirement
allowance which is a life annuity terminable upon death of the annuitant and is an amount equal to
two percent (2%) of final compensation multiplied by the number of years of total service, not to
exceed thirty-seven and one-half (37½) years for services on and prior to June 30, 2012. For service
on and after July 1, 2012: (i) For members with fewer than twenty (20) years of total service as of
June 30, 2012, a member’s retirement allowance shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the member’s
final compensation multiplied by the member’s years of total service on and after July 1, 2012; and
(ii) For members with twenty (20) or more years of total service as of June 30, 2012, a member’s
retirement allowance shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the member’s average compensation
multiplied by the member’s years of total service between July 1, 2012, and June 30, 2015, and two
percent (2%) of the member’s average compensation multiplied by the member’s years of total
service on and after July 1, 2015. For purposes of computing a member’s total service under the
preceding sentence, service purchases shall be included in total service only with respect to those
service purchases approved prior to June 30, 2012, and those applications for service purchases
received by the retirement system on or before June 30, 2012. In no event shall a member’s
retirement allowance exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the member’s final compensation.
Provided, however, that every person elected prior to July 1, 2012, who has served as a part time
elected official of the city of Cranston for a period of ten (10) years, is entitled to receive, upon
retirement from that part time service, and not being otherwise regularly employed by the city of
Cranston in which that person has served, a service retirement allowance equivalent to fifty percent
(50%) of the salary received at the time of retirement by that part time elected official; and,
provided, further, that if that person retires after a period of service greater than ten (10) years, the
person is entitled to receive an additional service retirement allowance equivalent to five percent
LC002348 - Page 6 of 8

(5%) of the salary received at the time of retirement for each whole year of service, in excess of ten
(10) years up to a maximum additional allowance equivalent to fifty percent (50%) of the salary
received.
(b) This section also applies to any former part time elected official of the city of Cranston
who is presently receiving retirement benefits from the municipal retirement system.
(c) Every person elected prior to July 1, 2012, who serves or has served at least four (4)
years as a part time elected official of the city of Cranston may include that person’s years of service
as a member of the general assembly, and any other credits acquired while serving as a legislator,
when computing the person’s period of service to the city of Cranston pursuant to the provisions
of this section.
(d) Effective July 1, 2025, an employee’s retirement allowance shall be calculated as
follows:
1-20 years of service 1% per year
21-30 years of service 1.5% per year
31-35 years of service 2% per year
36-40 years of service 3% per year
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002348
========
LC002348 - Page 7 of 8